Hawaii statutes.
§141-6 Appeal from inspector's decision.
Any person who feels aggrieved at any decision of any inspector of the
department of agriculture shall have the right to appeal from the decision to
the board of agriculture. The board shall give a prompt hearing to the
appellant and the inspector upon the appeal, and decide the question at issue,
which decision shall be subject to judicial review as provided in chapter 91.
[L 1903, c 44, §17; RL 1925, §643; RL 1935, §239; RL 1945, §1365; RL 1955,
§18-17; am L 1965, c 96, §14; HRS §141-6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next